North Carolina, session 2025, HB431.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. IDENTIFY VERIFICATION AND SUSPICIOUS INSTRUMENTS
SECTION 1. Article 2 of Chapter 161 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 161-32. Identity verification and suspicious instruments.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Instrument. – Any document that purports to convey title to, or an interest in,
real property, such as a deed, deed of trust, or other similar document.
(2) Suspicious instrument. – An instrument submitted for registration for which
the register of deeds has found any of the following:
a. The name or information of an acknowledging officer who has
purported to acknowledge the instrument does not match the official
records for that acknowledging officer.
b. The instrument purports not to be subject to the laws of the United
States or the laws of this State.
c. The document does not conform to registration requirements
established by the laws of this State.
d. The instrument is materially false, fictitious, or fraudulent and has not
been submitted by a trusted submitter or an authorized representative
of a trusted submitter.
(3) Trusted submitter. – Includes all of the following:
a. A title insurance company as described in Article 26 of Chapter 28 of
the General Statutes.
b. An attorney licensed to practice in this State.
*H431-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. A financial institution as defined in G.S. 53B-2.
(b) Identity Verification. – Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary in this
Chapter, when an instrument is presented to the register of deeds for registration by an individual
who is not a trusted submitter or the authorized agent of a trusted submitter, the register of deeds
shall require the person presenting the instrument to produce a government-issued photographic
identification card as follows:
(1) If an individual who is not a trusted submitter or an authorized agent of a
trusted submitter presents an instrument to the register of deeds for registration
in person, the register of deeds shall require the individual to produce a
government-issued photographic identification card for inspection by the
register of deeds before registering the instrument. The register of deeds must
record the name and address of such person, as the information appears on the
identification card, in a record to be kept by the register of deeds, along with
the official records book and page number or instrument number of the
instrument registered in connection to the production of the identification
card. Such a record may not be made available for viewing on the register of
deeds' official public website but shall be made available for public inspection
and copying as required by the public records laws of this State.
(2) If an individual who is not a trusted submitter or an authorized agent of a
trusted submitter presents an instrument in the form of an electronic
document, as defined in G.S. 47-16.3(2), to the register of deeds, as provided
by Article 1A of Chapter 47 of the General Statutes, the register of deeds shall
require the individual to submit a photocopy of a government-issued
photographic identification card before registering the instrument. The
register of deeds must note on the photocopy of the identification card the
official records book and page number or instrument number assigned to the
instrument registered in connection to the submission of the photocopy of the
identification card and retain the photocopy of such identification card in a
record to be kept by the register of deeds. Such a record may not be made
available for viewing on the register of deeds' official public website but shall
be made available for public inspection and copying as required by the public
records laws of this State. However, a person who submits a photocopy of his
or her identification card under this subsection may redact from the photocopy
of such identification card before submission all of the information he or she
does not wish to be made public, except for his or her name, address, and
photograph.
(c) Refusing to Register. – Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary in this
Chapter, the register of deeds shall refuse to register an instrument if one of the following occurs:
(1) The register of deeds deems the instrument presented for registration a
suspicious instrument under subdivision (a)(2) of this section.
(2) The individual presenting the instrument for registration is not a trusted
submitter or an authorized representative of a trusted submitter and fails to
provide the register of deeds with a government-issued photographic
identification card as required by subsection (b) of this section.
(3) The individual presenting the instrument for registration is not a trusted
submitter or an authorized representative of a trusted submitter and the name
on the government-issued photographic identification card presented by the
individual pursuant to subsection (b) of this section does not match the name
of the grantor or conveying party in the instrument presented for registration.
Page 2 House Bill 431-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(d) Additional Actions for Suspicious Instruments. – Upon finding that an instrument
presented for registration is a suspicious instrument under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the
register of deeds may do any of the following:
(1) Report the suspicious instrument to an appropriate law enforcement agency.
(2) Notify the acknowledging officer purported to have acknowledged the
instrument of the reason for the register of deeds finding that the instrument
is a suspicious instrument.
(e) Notice of Requirements. – The register of deeds shall provide notice of the
identification verification requirement described in subsection (b) of this section to the register
of deeds' official public website.
(f) Legal Protections and Remedies. –
(1) An injured person has a cause of action against a register of deeds for that
register of deeds' refusal to record an instrument based on that register of
deeds' allegedly erroneous finding that the instrument is a suspicious
instrument, as allowed by subdivision (c)(1) of this section. In an action
authorized by this subsection, an injured person is only entitled to appropriate
declaratory or injunctive relief. Notwithstanding G.S. 161-16, a register of
deeds shall not be liable for damages or any other claim of monetary relief in
an action brought under this subdivision.
(2) There is no right or cause of action against, and no civil liability on the part
of, the register of deeds or the county with respect to the register of deeds'
requirement of an identification card or any refusal to register an instrument
as allowed by subdivision (c)(2) or (c)(3) of this section.
(g) Confidentiality. – Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the register of
deeds to provide or allow access to a record or other information that is considered confidential
information as defined by G.S. 132-1.2."

PART II. FRAUD DETECTION ALERT SYSTEM
SECTION 2. Article 2 of Chapter 161 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 161-33. Fraud detection alert system.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Fraud detection alert system. – A system which sends automated recording
notifications.
(2) Land record. – A deed, deed of trust, mortgage, or other document purporting
to convey or encumber an interest in real property.
(3) Monitored identity. – A personal, trust, or business name submitted by a
registrant for monitoring under a fraud detection alert system.
(4) Recording notification. – A notification sent by electronic mail indicating to
a registrant that a land record associated with the registrant's monitored
identity has been recorded in the office of the register of deeds.
(5) Registrant. – A person who enrolls in a fraud detection alert system.
(b) The register of deeds shall ensure that registration for a fraud detection alert system
is possible through an electronic registration portal, which portal shall include at least all of the
following features:
(1) Be accessible through a direct link on the register of deeds' official public
website.
(2) Allow a registrant to subscribe to receive recording notifications for at least
five monitored identities per valid electronic mail address provided.
(3) Include a method by which a registrant may unsubscribe from the system.
House Bill 431-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) List a phone number at which the register of deeds' office may be contacted
during normal business hours with questions related to the system.
(5) Send an automated electronic mail message to a registrant confirming the
registrant's successful registration for or action to unsubscribe from the
system, which message must identify each monitored identity for which a
subscription was received or canceled.
(c) When a land record is recorded for a monitored identity, a recording notification must
be sent within 24 hours after the recording has been completed to each registrant who is
subscribed to receive recording notifications for that monitored identity. Such notification must
contain at least the following:
(1) Information identifying the monitored identity for which the land record was
filed.
(2) The land record's recording date.
(3) The official record book and page number or instrument number assigned to
the land record by the register of deeds.
(4) Instructions for electronically searching for and viewing the land record using
the assigned official record book and page number or instrument number.
(5) A phone number at which the register of deeds' office may be contacted during
normal business hours with questions related to the recording notification.
(d) There is no right or cause of action against, and no civil liability on the part of, the
register of deeds or the county with respect to the creation, maintenance, or operation of a fraud
detection alert system as required by this section.
(e) The register of deeds may charge a reasonable fee to a registrant for enrolling in the
fraud detection alert system in an amount that does not exceed the actual cost of maintaining and
allowing access to the system."
SECTION 3.(a) The Legislative Research Commission (LRC) shall study the
feasibility of amending G.S. 161-33, as enacted in Section 2 of this act, to create a fraud detection
alert system where everyone who submits a land record for registration is automatically enrolled
in the fraud detection alert system without paying a fee. Before enrollment, the register of deeds
would provide each individual with a notice explaining the system – its purpose, how it works,
and how to opt out of enrollment.
As part of its study, the LRC shall do all of the following:
(1) Evaluate the practicality of implementing a fraud detection alert system with
automatic enrollment and an opt-out option, including technological and
staffing requirements for registers of deeds across all counties.
(2) Examine the fiscal impact on the State, counties, and/or registers of deeds,
including costs associated with developing, maintaining, and operating a fraud
detection alert system without charging a fee to the participant.
(3) Evaluate how well such a fraud detection alert system would prevent fraud as
compared to other potential systems or measures.
SECTION 3.(b) The LRC shall report its findings, together with any proposed
legislation, to the 2026 Regular Session of the 2025 General Assembly upon its convening.

PART III. PROVIDING FOR AN EXPEDITED CAUSE OF ACTION TO QUIET TITLE
AFFECTED BY FRAUDULENT INSTRUMENTS
SECTION 4. Article 1 of Chapter 41 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 41-10.2. Titles quieted; fraudulent instruments.
(a) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) Instrument. – Any of the following:
Page 4 House Bill 431-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. A transfer of title to real property by deed or devise or other instrument
transferring title to real property.
b. A deed of trust, mortgage, judgment, lien, encumbrance, financing
statement, affidavit, notice, memorandum, or any other instrument that
establishes a security interest in real property.
c. A contract, right of refusal, or any other instrument that purports to
establish an interest, encumbrance, claim, or right relating to real
property.
(b) The actual owner of an interest in real property subject to a recorded false, fictitious,
or fraudulent instrument may seek expedited relief under this section by filing an action in district
court alleging the filing or recording of a false, fictitious, or fraudulent instrument in a public
record or a private record generally available to the public. The notice shall be served and proof
of service shall be made in any manner provided by the Rules of Civil Procedure for service of
summons, including service by registered mail or certified mail, return receipt requested. After a
minimum of five days' notice in a manner prescribed in Rule 5 of the Rules of Civil Procedure
and opportunity to be heard to all persons claiming an ownership interest in the property, any
lienholder of record, including any person to whom a security instrument directs notice to be sent
and any person obligated to repay the indebtedness secured by the instrument, the court shall
convene a hearing. For purposes of the notice requirement in this subsection, the party seeking
relief may serve the person listed as grantor in the recorded purportedly false, fictitious, or
fraudulent instrument at the address listed in the instrument. If the court finds that there is no
statutory, contractual, or other merited legal justification for the instrument, the court shall find
that the recorded instrument is false and is void as a matter of law and shall enter an order to
remove the cloud from the title to the real property. The submission of an original instrument
demonstrating source of title, affidavit, or a lis pendens, notice of previous fraud, or other similar
instrument recorded by the actual owner of an interest in the real property shall be considered
evidence of fraudulent activity. The court may also include in the order any of the following
types of relief:
(1) Grant to a prevailing party possession of the real property and order the
ejectment of any party on the premises.
(2) Award attorneys' fees and other costs for the action to the prevailing party.
(3) Stay any proceedings involving the subject real property in which the property
owner or owners are not a party to.
(4) Upon a finding by the court that an action filed under this section is frivolous
or malicious, assess a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars
($10,000), of which the clear proceeds assessed under this subdivision shall
be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with
G.S. 115C-457.2.
(5) Upon a finding by the court that a party has presented for filing or recording
a false, fictitious, or fraudulent instrument as described in this section more
than once, enter a pre-filing injunction against the party.
(6) Enjoin a party from listing the real property for sale, lease, or any other similar
advertisement.
(c) Upon being presented with an order duly issued by a court of competent jurisdiction
of this State declaring that an instrument already recorded is false and void as a matter of law,
the register of deeds or clerk of superior court that received the recording shall record and
cross-index the court's order finding the instrument to be false. The register of deeds or clerk of
superior court may also conspicuously mark on the first page of the original record previously
recorded the following statement: "THE CLAIM ASSERTED IN THIS DOCUMENT IS FALSE
AND IS NOT PROVIDED FOR BY THE GENERAL LAWS OF THIS STATE."
House Bill 431-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(d) In addition to any civil penalties provided for in this section, the presentation of an
instrument for recording with a register of deeds or a clerk of superior court that is determined to
be materially false, fictitious, or fraudulent shall constitute a violation of G.S. 75-1.1.
(e) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall develop a form for the expedited relief
filing established by this section, and the clerk of superior court shall make the form available
for a petitioner. In addition to the requirements set forth in this section, the form shall include
clear language notifying the filing party that providing false information or statements is perjury
pursuant to G.S. 14-209 and punishable as a Class F felony."

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective October 1, 2025, and
apply to instruments and documents presented for registration on or after that date. Section 4 of
this act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to causes of action arising on or after that
date. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 6 House Bill 431-First Edition